Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2363.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144.651, subdivision 10a, is amended to read: Subd. 10a. Designated support person deleted text begin for pregnant patient or other patientdeleted text end . (a) Subject to paragraph (c), a health care provider and a health care facility must allow, at a minimum, one designated support person chosen by a patient, including but not limited to a pregnant patient, to be physically present while the patient is receiving health care services including during a hospital stay.new text begin Subject to paragraph (c), a facility must allow, at a minimum, one designated support person chosen by the resident to be physically present with the resident while the resident is at the facility.new text end (b) For purposes of this subdivision, "designated support person" means any person chosen by the patient new text begin or resident new text end to provide comfort to the patient new text begin or resident, new text end including but not limited to the patient's new text begin or resident's new text end spouse, partner, family member, or another person related by affinity. Certified doulas and traditional midwives may not be counted toward the limit of one designated support person. (c) A facility may restrict or prohibit the presence of a designated support person in treatment rooms, procedure rooms, and operating rooms when such a restriction or prohibition is strictly necessary to meet the appropriate standard of care. A facility may also restrict or prohibit the presence of a designated support person if the designated support person is acting in a violent or threatening manner toward others. Any restriction or prohibition of a designated support person by the facility is subject to the facility's written internal grievance procedure required by subdivision 20. new text begin (d) This subdivision does not apply to a patient or resident at a state-operated treatment program, as defined in section 253B.02, subdivision 18d. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 144G.91, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 6a. new text end new text begin Designated support person. new text end new text begin (a) Subject to paragraph (c), an assisted living facility must allow, at a minimum, one designated support person chosen by the resident to be physically present with the resident while the resident is at the facility. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this subdivision, "designated support person" means any person chosen by the resident to provide comfort to the resident, including but not limited to the resident's spouse, partner, family member, or another person related by affinity. new text end new text begin (c) A facility may restrict or prohibit the presence of a designated support person when the restriction or prohibition is strictly necessary to meet the appropriate standard of care or when the designated support person is acting in a violent or threatening manner toward others. If the facility restricts or prohibits a resident's designated support person from being present, the resident may file a complaint or inquiry with the facility according to subdivision 20. new text end